packages/search/tsearch2/dict/greek/el_GR.utf8.dict
Σείριο/d
άμα/e
έπαθα/eg
έχτα/e
αγραφιώτη/K
αδόμητος/IXdjn
αιτούσα/Naegh
ακτινοπροστασία/h
αλληλέγγυος/IQdekn
αλληλένδετης/IX
ανάγλυφο/IQd
ανάπτυξης/IX
αναγγελθείσα/Nh
αναληθής/HLXi
ανελαστικό/FG
ανεχόμουν/Zh
ανεύθυνα/e
ανοχή/LWi
ανταγωγικός/FGLMXa
ανταποκριθήκαμε/b
αντιδημοκρατικό/FL
αξιολογήσω/GTYam
αξιολογικός/FGJLMXa
απαιτώ/JKMein
απαλοιφή/W
απαντήσω/GPTYabjm
απεριόριστος/IQXden
απευθύνω/PRTVWYckm
αποκλείω/JTWYckm
απολαμβάνω/JPTYm
απολυόμενος/IQdjkn
αποτίμηση/K
αποτελούσα/Negh
απόδημος/IQXdejkn
αρκώ/JMehil
αρμόδιος/IQdejkn
αρχή/LWi
αφανής/HLXi
αφιερώνω/JPRTWYbkm
βαθιά/GLi
βαθύς/JOQUn
βαλκανικός/FGJKLMXa
βαρελά/G
βαρύς/OQU
βασιζόμενος/IQXejkn
βενζίνα/h
βλάπτουν/E
βλαβών/A
βοηθήσω/PTYabjm
βουτσί/Mf
βρίσκω/JPRSTVWYabckm
γέρο/IQd
γίνουν/B
γίνω/GPRSTVWYabcekm
γαζί/Mf
γερμανικός/FGJLMXa
γι/l
γιαλός/GJMa
γνωρίσω/PTYabjm
γουλί/MOUf
γραφή/CDELWi
γραφεί/CDE
γυρίζουν/B
γωνία/Nh
δάνειο/IQd
δένω/GJPRSTVWYabcdekm
δίδουν/CE
δαπανώ/FGJMegim
δενόμουν/YZhm
δεχθούν/CE
δημοσιεύω/PTWYckm
διάδικος/Qdjkn
διαβλέπω/PTYm
διαγράμμιση/K
διαλυμένης/INX
διαλυτική/LWi
διαπιστώσω/GPTYabm
διαφωτισμό/G
διεθνικό/FGL
διεξόδων/A
διερχόμενος/IXdjkn
δικής/LOXi
δικαστεί/BD
δικαστικά/DLi
δικαστικός/FGHJKLMXa
δοθείσης/CEIN
δοκιμάσω/PTYabjm
δουλέψω/PTYajm
δυτικός/FGHJKLXa
δύσκολα/Ne
εγγονός/GJKLMXa
εδαφικός/FGJKLXa
εθνοφρουρό/FG
εικόνας/INQ
εισάγω/JPRTWYbckm
εισπράξω/GPTYam
εκδοχή/Wi
εκμαγείο/IQ
εκτείνω/TWck
εκφράζοντα/gh
εκφράζω/JPRTWYckm
εμπιστευόμουν/Zm
ενδιαφέρω/RSTVWbckm
ενοχλώ/IJMehn
εντοιχισμένης/INX
εντοπισμένη/K
εξακριβώσω/GTm
εξισωτική/LWi
επανέλθω/PTYm
επαναφέρω/JPTWYkm
επαρκώ/HIJM
επιβιώσω/Tam
επιγραμματικός/FJXa
επικεντρώσω/TYm
επιτελή/LW
επιτρέποντα/gh
επιτρέπω/JPTWYckm
εργαζόμενος/IQXdejkn
εστί/U
ετήσιος/IQdejkn
ετοιμάζω/JPRTVWYckm
ευρύτατο/IQd
θέσεώς/DE
θηκών/C
θηλυκά/Li
θρακικό/FGL
θυμηθεί/B
ιασμό/G
ιδιωτικός/FGHJKLMXa
ιεροκήρυκα/h
ικανοποιώ/JMei
ικριώματος/I
ιμάμης/Xf
ισορροπήσω/TYm
ισχυριζόμενης/INX
ιώνιο/A
κάθετος/IQXdejkn
κάνω/GJPTYabejm
καθόμουν/Zh
καραβάκι/l
κατάφερνα/eg
καταγεγραμμένο/IQd
καταγωγή/W
κατασκευάζω/JTWYckm
καταφύγω/PTYm
κατοικημένος/QXekn
καϊσί/O
κινητοποιήσεως/A
κινώντας/E
κλίσεώς/C
κλασικό/FGL
κοινωνικός/FGHJKLMXa
κουμπί/MOUf
κουράζω/PRTVWkm
κουτί/MOUf
κρίνω/JPTWYacekm
κρετινισμό/G
κρύπτω/Vk
κυρωθεί/AD
κυρώσω/AGm
κύκλος/Qdejkn
λέμε/BE
λαμπάς/RS
λατομικός/FGJLXa
λείπουν/DE
λημέρι/l
λιανικής/HLXi
λιμεναρχείο/Id
λογαριασμός/GKLMa
λογιζόταν/D
λύσεις/CE
μένοντα/Eh
μαλακός/FGJKLXa
μασώ/FGMOPTm
μειώσω/GTYajm
μερικός/FGHKLMXa
μεταμορφώσω/PTm
μετατιθέμενος/djk
μετρία/gh
μετρική/Li
μηρί/OU
μιλώ/FGJKMOPTUmn
μολυβί/MUf
μονομελή/LWi
μπήκα/abeg
νήμα/VW
ναυτεργατική/LW
νεμόμουν/Z
νιώθω/PTYaem
νοητά/DLi
ντάρα/A
ξανθός/FGJLOXa
οδηγώ/FJKMSTehimn
οικοδομήσιμης/INX
ομάς/RS
οριστικός/FGHJKLMXa
οφειλόμενος/IQXdejkn
πέφτει/E
πήρε/BC
πίνω/PSTWYaekm
παγκάκι/l
παιδί/MOUf
πανεπιστήμιο/IQd
παράγω/JPTWYbckm
παραδουλεύτρα/h
παραθαλάσσιος/IQdejn
παραθεριστικός/FGJKLXa
παρακρατώ/FJMei
παραλάβω/PTYabm
παραπεμπόμενη/K
παροιμιακός/FGJKXa
περιγράφω/JPSTWYckm
περιγράψω/TYabjm
περιλαμβάνω/JPRTWckm
περιμένω/JPTYabm
περιστέλλω/JTk
περιστασιακής/HLXi
πετάξω/PTYabjm
πλεύσω/Tm
πλωτό/FGL
πολιτειακή/LWi
ποντιακή/LW
πουλί/MOUf
πουλώ/FGMOPTUWZim
προσθέτω/HJPTWYcdkm
προστατεύω/RSTWYckm
προσφεύγοντος/I
προτιμώ/FJKMOPegim
πρωτόγονο/Id
πώμα/VW
ροδί/O
ροκάς/FR
σάλπιγγα/Nh
σήψη/P
σακχαρώδη/K
σαλόνι/l
σαφούς/A
σηκωθείτε/B
στέκω/RSTVWcekm
στήσει/DE
σταθεροποιητικό/FGL
σταματώ/FMOPTm
σταχτί/MOUf
στερήσει/C
στρατεύσιμος/IXdjkn
στρώμα/VW
συζητώ/FIJKMOPUWZeim
συμβολική/LW
συμπράξω/GTm
συναγάγω/TYam
συναντώ/FKMOPRUWZacgm
συνεχόμενος/IQXdejkn
συνημμένος/HIQXdjkn
συνταγματικής/HLXi
σχεδιάζονται/B
σωστός/FGJKLXa
σύρθηκε/CE
τάραχο/A
τακτικής/HLXi
ταυτόσημος/IQXdejkn
τείνω/JTYem
τεθέν/D
τιμήσουμε/C
τονίσω/TYabm
τοποθετημένος/IQXdejkn
τρέξω/PTYabjm
τρυγόνι/l
υπερασπίζοντα/g
υπερασπίζω/PRWckm
υπολογίσω/PTYadjm
υφασμάτινο/IQd
φάσμα/V
φέρουσα/Nh
φαί/MOf
φαίνω/PSVWcdk
φιλολογικός/FGJLXa
φοιτήσω/GTjm
φοροτεχνικός/FGKLMXa
φρενός/L
χορεύω/TWYm
χορηγηθέντος/IQ
χορηγηθείσα/Nh
χωρίζω/PTWYckm
χωρισθεί/CD
χωρισμός/CGLa
ψυχικός/FGHJLXa
ωφελεί/U
